Utah statutes.
11-14-402.   Exemptions from application of chapter -- Exception.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), this chapter does not apply to bonds issued by the state of Utah nor to bonds or obligations payable solely from special assessments levied on benefited property.

(2)  Sections 11-14-303 and 11-14-501 have general application in accordance with their terms.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 105, 2005 General Session

